src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
kääret:käär n_32_et ;
kiiret:kiir n_32_et ;
eksemppelivantut:eksemppeli#vant2 n_32_ut ;
puulvantut:puul#vant2 n_32_ut ;
vantut:vant2 n_32_ut ;
villavantthuut:villa#vant2 n_32_ut_pl ;
kipenet:kipen n_32_et ;
taittheet:taitt n_32_et_pl ;
jatkopuhheet:jatko#puh n_32_et_pl ;
palkheet:palk n_32_et_pl ;
ensisyntynheet:ensisyntyn n_32_et_pl ;
matonkutheet:maton#kut n_32_et_pl ;
merkkivaattheet:merkki#vaatt n_32_et_pl ;
ulkovaattheet:ulko#vaatt n_32_et_pl ;
veljekset:velje n_22_excns_pl ;
vares:vare n_22_excns ;
tonget:tong n_32_et ;
puhet:puh n_32_et ;
koleraapis:koleraap2i n_22_excns ;
krannikset:kranni n_22_excns_pl ;
jänes:jäne n_22_excns ;
penis:peni n_22_excns ;
klitoris:klitori n_22_excns_even ;
turkis:turki n_22_excns ;
haastet:haast n_32_et ;
rajet:rak n_32_et ;
apuvehjet:apu#vehk n_32_et ;
liiket:liikk n_32_et ;
maihyljet:mai#hylk n_32_et ;
länget:länk n_32_et ;
taipalet:taipal n_32_et ;
sirpalet:sirpal n_32_et ;
perkelet:perkel n_32_et ;
porrasaskelet:porras#askel n_32_et_2 ;
askelet:askel n_32_et_2 ;
kyynelet:kyynel n_32_et_2 ;
kantelet:kantel n_32_et_2 ;
perinet:perint n_32_et_2 ;
perintökapinheet:perintö#kapin n_32_et_pl ;
hihtamavehkheet:hihtama#vehk n_32_et_pl ;
myötälet:myötäl n_32_et ;
hamet:ham n_32_et ;
homet:hom n_32_et ;
hämet:häm n_32_et ;
pankkivenet:pankki#ven n_32_et ;
sukelusvenet:sukelus#ven n_32_et ;
lukaalivenet:lukaali#ven n_32_et ;
veđenalusvenet:veđen#alus#ven n_32_et ;
jälkimainet:jälki#main n_32_et ;
ainet:ain n_32_et ;
asentohuonet:asento#huon n_32_et ;
kotohuonet:koto#huon n_32_et ;
raatihuonet:raati#huon n_32_et ;
syöttähuonet:syöttä#huon n_32_et ;
hernet:hern n_32_et ;
eepos:eep2o n_22_excns ;
kiitos:kiit2o n_22_excns ;
aviorikos:avio#rik2o n_22_excns ;
reekelinmuutos:reekelin#muut2o n_22_excns ;
tulos:tulo n_22_excns ;
kinos:kino n_22_excns ;
kieros:kiero n_22_excns ;
fylkinneuvos:fylkin#neuvo n_22_excns ;
tykötarvet:tykö#tarp n_32_et ;
kranniperet:kranni#per n_32_et ;
oset:os n_32_et ;
kusisađet:kusi#sat n_32_et ;
oikkeustieđet:oikkeus#tiet n_32_et ;
lyhđet:lyht n_32_et ;
sivakkavoiđet:sivakka#voit n_32_et ;
rinnet:rint n_32_et ;
aaret:aart n_32_et ;
päivänpaistet:päivän#paist n_32_et ;
listet:list n_32_et ;
roustet:roust n_32_et ;
pyhävaatet:pyhä#vaatt n_32_et ;
viikatet:viikatt n_32_et ; ! XXX check viikatet/vikaatet
kortet:kortt n_32_et ;
säđet:sät n_32_et ;
mielikuvitus:mieli#kuvit2u n_22_excns_even ;
ajatus:ajat2u n_22_excns_even ;
bunaadinstatus:bunaadin#stat2u n_22_excns ;
tempus:temp2u n_22_excns ;
kasvatus:kasvat2u n_22_excns_even ;
kuljetus:kuljet2u n_22_excns_even ;
raavhaittenopetus:raavhaitten#opet2u n_22_excns_even ;
bonus:bonu n_22_excns ;
ilmaus:ilmau n_22_excns ;
raivaus:raivau n_22_excns ;
diabetes:diabet2e n_22_excns ;
ylikansoitus:ylikansoit2u n_22_excns_even ;
harjoitus:harjoit2u n_22_excns_even ;
sieväkirjoitus:sievä#kirjoit2u n_22_excns_even ;
eroitus:eroit2u n_22_excns_even ;
hajotus:hajot2u n_22_excns_even ;
ilmotus:ilmot2u n_22_excns_even ;
tieđotus:tieđot2u n_22_excns_even ;
raavhaittenkoulutus:raavhaitten#koulut2u n_22_excns_even ;
kalankasutus:kalan#kasut2u n_22_excns_even ;
taivutus:taivut2u n_22_excns_even ;
triivaus:triivau n_22_excns ;
etableeraus:etableerau n_22_excns ;
situeeraus:situeerau n_22_excns ;
sentraliseeraus:sentraliseerau n_22_excns_even ;
taphaus:taphau n_22_excns ;
ulosvatkaus:ulos#vatkau n_22_excns ;
sesonkivajelus:sesonki#vajelu n_22_excns_even ;
mettänhakkaus:mettän#hakkau n_22_excns ;
makkaukset:makkau n_22_excns_pl ;
leikkaus:leikkau n_22_excns ;
raiskaus:raiskau n_22_excns ;
tillaus:tillau n_22_excns ;
turnaus:turnau n_22_excns ;
adjektiividefineeraus:adjektiivi#defineerau n_22_excns ;
lanseeraus:lanseerau n_22_excns_even ;
säävarraus:sää#varrau n_22_excns ;
elläinuhraus:elläin#uhrau n_22_excns ;
huntteeraus:huntteerau n_22_excns_even ;
mittaus:mittau n_22_excns ;
kunteus:kunteu n_22_excns ;
kielikeskus:kieli#kesku n_22_excns ;
kansanmuistelus:kansan#muistelu n_22_excns_even ;
muistelus:muistelu n_22_excns_even ;
sovelus:sovelu n_22_excns_even ;
ittetuntemus:itte#tuntemu n_22_excns_even ;
kyselytutkimus:kysely#tutkimu n_22_excns_even ;
laikkosopimus:laikko#sopimu n_22_excns_even ;
aikomus:aikomu n_22_excns_even ;
silmus:silmu n_22_excns ;
kustanus:kustanu n_22_excns_even ;
oikkeusrakenus:oikkeus#rakenu n_22_excns_even ;
kustannus:kustannu n_22_excns_even ;
tarjous:tarjou n_22_excns ;
kokkous+Err/Orth:kokou n_22_excns ;
kattostus:kattostu n_22_excns_even ;
kauhistus:kauhistu n_22_excns_even ;
unistus:unistu n_22_excns_even ;
tunnustus:tunnustu n_22_excns_even ;
avustus:avustu n_22_excns_even ;
tavus:tavu n_22_excns ;
kiđukset:kiđu n_22_excns_pl ;
kielitälläykset:kieli#tälläy n_22_excns_pl ;
akiles:akil n_32_ts ;
kirves:kirv n_32_ts ;
lievitys:lievit2y n_22_excns_even ;
jännitys:jännit2y n_22_excns_even ;
myrkytys:myrkyt2y n_22_excns_even ;
herätys:herät2y n_22_excns_even ;
eppäilys:eppäily n_22_excns_even ;
päälys:pääly n_22_excns ;
näkemys:näkemy n_22_excns_even ;
itteymmärys:itte#ymmäry n_22_excns_even ;
kiristys:kiristy n_22_excns_even ;
eđistys:eđisty n_22_excns_even ;
läijäys:läijäy n_22_excns ;
motorikulkumääräys:motorikulku#määräy n_22_excns ;
piäs:piä n_22_excns ;
päätös:päät2ö n_22_excns ;
